Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 8
OFFENSES - MAIL VOTING
AND VOTING BY NEW RESIDENTS

1-13-801. Mailing other materials with mail ballot.

It is unlawful for any county clerk and recorder to deliver or mail to a registered elector, as a part of or in connection with the mail ballot, anything other than the voting material as provided in article 7.5 of this title 1. Any person who violates this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 438, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1436, § 123, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1797, § 67, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 749, § 125, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3131, § 45, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-145 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

(1) For the delivery of mail-in ballot, see § 1-8-111.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-802. Delivery of a mail ballot outside county clerk and recorder's office.

No county clerk and recorder shall make personal delivery of any mail ballot to an elector unless such delivery occurs within the confines of the official office of such county clerk and recorder, except as otherwise provided in section 1-7.5-113. Any delivery contrary to this section renders void the ballot to which it relates. Any county clerk and recorder who violates this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 438, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1436, § 124, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1774, § 80, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1797, § 68, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 749, § 126, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3131, § 46, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-146 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-803. Offenses relating to voting by mail ballot.

Any election official or other person who knowingly violates article 7.5 or 13.5 of this title 1 relative to the casting of mail ballots or who aids or abets fraud in connection with any vote cast, to be cast, or attempted to be cast by a mail voter upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 438, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1436, § 125, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 854, § 89, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1797, § 69, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 749, § 127, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 74, § 43, effective February 18.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3131, § 47, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-148 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-13-804. Duty to report lost, stolen, or late ballots - penalty.

Any person responsible for preparing, issuing, transporting, or mailing ballots who has personal knowledge that mail ballots under that person's care have been either lost or stolen or will, for any reason, not be timely delivered to electors, shall report the issue to the county clerk and recorder. Any person who knowingly and willfully fails to report as required by this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111. This section shall not apply to election judges, staff of the county clerk and recorder, or individual United States postal workers.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1313), ch. 260, p. 1255, § 4, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3132, § 48, effective March 1, 2022.